Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 2
MAXIMUM FINANCE CHARGES
AND OTHER FEES AND CHARGES

5-2-201. Finance charge for consumer credit transactions.

With respect to a consumer loan other than a supervised loan, including a revolving loan, a lender may contract for and receive a finance charge calculated according to the actuarial method not exceeding twelve percent per year on the unpaid balance of the amount financed.

With respect to a supervised loan or a consumer credit sale, except for a loan or sale pursuant to a revolving account, a supervised lender or seller may contract for and receive a finance charge, calculated according to the actuarial method, not exceeding the equivalent of the greater of either of the following:

The total of:

Thirty-six percent per year on that part of the unpaid balances of the amount financed that is one thousand dollars or less;

Twenty-one percent per year on that part of the unpaid balances of the amount financed that is more than one thousand dollars but does not exceed three thousand dollars; and

Fifteen percent per year on that part of the unpaid balances of the amount financed that is more than three thousand dollars; or

Twenty-one percent per year on the unpaid balances of the amount financed.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), the finance charge for a supervised loan or consumer credit sale pursuant to a revolving credit account, calculated according to the actuarial method, may not exceed twenty-one percent per year on the unpaid balance of the amount financed.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), if there is an unpaid balance on the date as of which the finance charge is applied, the creditor may contract for and receive a minimum finance charge not exceeding fifty cents.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (4), this section does not limit or restrict the manner of contracting for the finance charge, whether by way of add-on, discount, single annual percentage rate, or otherwise, so long as the rate of the finance charge does not exceed that permitted by this section.

A seller or lender may contract for the payment by a consumer of a prepaid finance charge. In addition to any other disclosure required by this code, a seller or lender shall disclose to the consumer the amount of any such prepaid finance charge.

If the consumer credit transaction is precomputed:

The finance charge may be calculated on the assumption that all scheduled payments will be made when due;

The effect of prepayment is governed by the provisions on rebate upon prepayment contained in section 5-2-211.

Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the term of a consumer credit transaction, for the purposes of this section, commences on the date the consumer credit transaction is made. Differences in the lengths of months are disregarded and a day may be counted as one-thirtieth of a month. Subject to classifications and differentiations the creditor may reasonably establish, a part of a month in excess of fifteen days may be treated as a full month if periods of fifteen days or less are disregarded and that procedure is not consistently used to obtain a greater yield than would otherwise be permitted.

Subject to classifications and differentiations the creditor may reasonably establish, the creditor may make the same finance charge on all amounts financed within a specified range. A finance charge so made does not violate this section if:

When applied to the median amount within each range, it does not exceed the maximum permitted in this section; and

When applied to the lowest amount within each range, it does not produce a rate of finance charge exceeding the rate calculated according to paragraph (a) of this subsection (6) by more than eight percent of such rate.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, the creditor, in connection with a consumer credit transaction other than a deferred deposit loan as defined in section 5-3.1-102 (3) or one pursuant to a revolving credit account, may contract for and receive a minimum loan finance charge of not more than twenty-five dollars.

With respect to a consumer insurance premium loan, the term of the loan commences on the earliest inception date of a policy or contract of insurance on which payment of the premium is financed by the loan.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1196, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(4)(b) amended, p. 28, § 2, effective March 9.

L. 2003:

(7) amended, p. 1892, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-201, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-202. Additional charges.

In addition to the finance charge permitted by this article and in a consumer lease, a creditor may contract for and receive the following additional charges in connection with a consumer credit transaction:

Official fees and taxes;

Charges for insurance as described in subsection (3) of this section;

Annual charges, payable in advance, for the privilege of using a credit card or similar arrangement;

Charges for other benefits conferred on the consumer, including insurance, if the benefits are of value to the consumer and if the charges are reasonable in relation to the benefits, are of a type that is not for credit, and are authorized as permissible additional charges by rule adopted by the administrator;

The following charges if agreed to by the parties:

A charge, not to exceed the greater of two dollars or two and one-half percent of the amount advanced, for each cash advance transaction made pursuant to a credit card; and

A fee, not to exceed twenty-five dollars, assessed upon return or dishonor of a check or other instrument tendered as payment.

No finance charge may be assessed on any charge listed in paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of this section.

An additional charge may be made for insurance written in connection with the transaction, other than insurance protecting the creditor against the consumer's default or other credit loss, if:

With respect to insurance against loss of or damage to property or against liability, the creditor furnishes a clear and specific statement in writing to the consumer setting forth the cost of the insurance if obtained from or through the creditor and stating that the consumer may choose the person through whom the insurance is to be obtained; and

With respect to consumer credit insurance providing life, accident, or health coverage, the insurance coverage is not a factor in the approval by the creditor of the extension of credit and this fact is clearly disclosed in writing to the consumer and if, in order to obtain the insurance in connection with the extension of credit, the consumer gives specific affirmative written indication of the consumer's desire to do so after written disclosure to the consumer of the cost thereof.

With respect to a debt secured by an interest in land, bona fide and reasonable closing costs described in section 5-1-301 (8) are additional charges.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1197, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1012, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

IP(1) amended, (HB 09-1141), ch. 41, p. 157, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-202, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-203. Delinquency charges.

With respect to a consumer credit transaction, the parties may contract for a delinquency charge on any installment or minimum payment not paid in full within ten days after its scheduled due date in an amount not exceeding:

Fifteen dollars for a transaction not secured by an interest in land; except that, if the transaction is precomputed, the amount may not exceed the greater of fifteen dollars or the deferral charge described in section 5-2-204 (1) that would be permitted to defer the unpaid amount of the installment for the period that it is delinquent; or

Five percent of the unpaid amount of the installment or minimum payment due for a transaction secured by an interest in land.

A delinquency charge under this section may be collected only once on an installment or minimum payment however long it remains in default. No delinquency charge may be collected if the installment or minimum payment has been deferred and a deferral charge described in section 5-2-204 has been paid or incurred until ten days after the deferred due date. A delinquency charge may be collected at the time it accrues or at any time thereafter.

No delinquency charge may be collected on an installment or minimum payment that is paid in full within ten days after its scheduled installment due date even though an earlier maturing installment, minimum payment, or a delinquency charge on an earlier installment or minimum payment may not have been paid in full. For purposes of this subsection (3), payments are applied first to current installments or minimum payments due and then to delinquent installments or minimum payments due.

A creditor who has imposed a delinquency charge shall notify the consumer in writing of the amount of the delinquency charge assessed as follows:

Before the due date of the next scheduled payment;

If the creditor provides the consumer with periodic statements for each installment, on or with the next periodic statement provided to the consumer after the delinquency charge has been assessed; or

For a revolving credit account for which a credit card is issued and that is not secured by an interest in land, before, on, or with the next periodic statement after the delinquency charge has been assessed.

A creditor shall not assess a delinquency charge unless the delinquency charge is assessed within thirty days after the scheduled due date of any installment not paid in full or, for a revolving credit account for which a credit card is issued and that is not secured by an interest in land, within ninety days after the scheduled due date of the delinquent minimum payment.

No finance charge may be assessed on any delinquency charge. For purposes of this section, for revolving credit, an installment is the minimum payment that the debtor is required to make during any billing cycle excluding any past-due amount from any previous billing cycle.

If two installments or parts thereof of a precomputed transaction are in default for ten days or more, the creditor may elect to convert the transaction from a precomputed transaction to one in which the finance charge is based on unpaid balances, and the terms of the converted transaction shall be no less favorable to the consumer than the terms of the original transaction. In this event the creditor shall make a rebate pursuant to the provisions on rebate upon prepayment contained in section 5-2-211 as of the maturity date of the first delinquent installment and thereafter may make a finance charge as authorized by the provisions on finance charges. The amount of the rebate shall not be reduced by the amount of any permitted minimum charge described in section 5-2-201. If the creditor proceeds under this subsection (6), any delinquency or deferral charges made with respect to installments due at or after the maturity date of the first delinquent installment shall be rebated and no further delinquency or deferral charges shall be made.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1198, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(4) amended, p. 842, § 1, effective May 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-203, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-204. Deferral charges.

With respect to a precomputed consumer credit transaction, the parties before or after default may agree in writing to a deferral of all or part of one or more unpaid installments, and the creditor may make and collect a charge not exceeding the rate previously stated to the consumer pursuant to the provisions on disclosure contained in section 5-3-101 applied to the amount or amounts deferred for the period of deferral calculated without regard to differences in the lengths of months, but proportionally for a part of a month, counting each day as one-thirtieth of a month. A deferral charge may be collected at the time it is assessed or at any time thereafter.

The creditor, in addition to the deferral charge, may make appropriate additional charges described in section 5-2-202, and the amount of these charges that is not paid in cash may be added to the amount deferred for the purpose of calculating the deferral charge.

The parties may agree in writing at the time of a precomputed consumer credit transaction that, if an installment is not paid within ten days after its due date, the creditor may unilaterally grant a deferral and make charges as provided in this section. No deferral charge may be made for a period after the date that the creditor elects to accelerate the maturity of the agreement.

A delinquency charge made by the creditor on an installment may not be retained if a deferral charge is made pursuant to this section with respect to the period of delinquency.

A deferral charge made according to this section is earned pro rata during the period in which no installment is scheduled to be paid by reason of the deferral and is fully earned on the last day of that period.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1200, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-204, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-205. Finance charge on refinancing.

With respect to a consumer credit transaction, the creditor may by agreement with the consumer refinance the unpaid balance and may contract for and receive a finance charge based on the amount financed resulting from the refinancing at a rate not exceeding that permitted by the provisions on finance charges. For the purpose of determining the finance charge permitted, the amount financed resulting from the refinancing comprises the following:

If the transaction was not precomputed, the total of the unpaid balance and the accrued charges on the date of the refinancing, or, if the transaction was precomputed, the amount that the consumer would have been required to pay upon prepayment pursuant to the provisions on rebate upon prepayment contained in section 5-2-211 on the date of refinancing; except that, for the purpose of computing this amount, no minimum charge described in section 5-2-201 shall be allowed; and

Appropriate additional charges described in section 5-2-202, payment of which is deferred.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1200, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-205, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-206. Finance charge on consolidation.

If a consumer owes an unpaid balance to a creditor with respect to a consumer credit transaction and becomes obligated on another consumer credit transaction with the same creditor, the parties may agree to a consolidation resulting in a single schedule of payments. If the previous consumer credit transaction was not precomputed, the parties may agree to add the unpaid amount of the amount financed and accrued charges on the date of consolidation to the amount financed with respect to the subsequent consumer credit transaction. If the previous consumer credit transaction was precomputed, the parties may agree to refinance the unpaid balance pursuant to the provisions on refinancing contained in section 5-2-205 and to consolidate the amount financed resulting from the refinancing by adding it to the amount financed with respect to the subsequent consumer credit transaction. In either case, the creditor may contract for and receive a finance charge based on the aggregate amount financed resulting from the consolidation at a rate not in excess of that permitted by the provisions on finance charges.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1201, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-205, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-207. Prepaid finance charge.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, a creditor may contract for the payment by the consumer of a prepaid finance charge; except that the total finance charge contracted for and received by the creditor shall not exceed that permitted for consumer credit transactions.

With respect to a refinancing pursuant to section 5-2-205 or consolidation pursuant to section 5-2-206 of a previous consumer credit transaction for which a prepaid finance charge was imposed, if said refinancing or consolidation is consummated within one year after the previous transaction, a new prepaid finance charge may be imposed:

Only on that portion of the aggregate amount financed resulting from the refinancing or consolidation that exceeds the unpaid balance of the previous transaction determined in accordance with the provisions of section 5-2-205 or section 5-2-206, whichever is appropriate; or

On the aggregate amount financed resulting from the refinancing or consolidation; except that any unearned portion of the prepaid finance charge imposed in connection with the previous transaction shall be rebated to the consumer in accordance with the actuarial method as defined in section 5-1-301 and applicable rules adopted by the administrator.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1201, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-3-206.5, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-208. Conversion to revolving account.

The parties may agree to add to a revolving account the unpaid balance of a consumer credit transaction not made pursuant to a revolving account. The unpaid balance is an amount equal to the amount financed determined according to the provisions on refinancing contained in section 5-2-205.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1201, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-207 (5), as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-209. Advances to perform covenants of consumer.

If the agreement with respect to a consumer credit transaction contains covenants by the consumer to perform certain duties pertaining to insuring or preserving collateral, and the creditor pursuant to the agreement pays for performance of the duties on behalf of the consumer, the creditor may add the amounts paid to the debt if:

The expenditure is reasonable to protect the risk of loss or damage to the property;

The creditor has mailed to the consumer, at the consumer's last known address, written notice of the consumer's nonperformance and has given the consumer reasonable opportunity after such notice to so perform; and

In the absence of performance, the creditor has made all expenditures on behalf of the consumer in good faith and in a commercially reasonable manner.

Within a reasonable time after advancing any sums, the creditor shall state to the consumer in writing the amount of the sums advanced, any charges with respect to this amount, and any revised payment schedule, and, if the duties of the consumer performed by the creditor pertain to insurance, a brief description of the insurance paid for by the creditor including the type and amount of coverage. No further information need be given.

A finance charge may be made for sums advanced pursuant to this section at a rate not exceeding the rate stated to the consumer pursuant to the provisions on disclosure contained in section 5-3-101 with respect to the consumer credit transaction; except that, with respect to a revolving account, the amount of the advance may be added to the unpaid balance of the debt and the creditor may make a finance charge not exceeding that permitted by the provisions on finance charges.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1202, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-208, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-210. Right to prepay.

Subject to the provisions on rebate upon prepayment contained in section 5-2-211, the consumer may prepay in full, or in part if payment is no less than five dollars, the unpaid balance of a consumer credit transaction at any time without penalty. A payment in the amount of a scheduled installment, other than the last scheduled installment, not identified by the consumer as a partial prepayment shall not be deemed to be a partial prepayment regardless of when the payment is made if the amount equals the next scheduled installment. If such a payment is applied by the creditor to the scheduled installment, the payment shall be deemed to have been made on the due date for the scheduled installment to which it was applied.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1202, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-209, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-211. Rebate upon prepayment - definitions.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, upon prepayment in full of the unpaid balance of a precomputed consumer credit transaction, an amount not less than the unearned portion of the finance charge calculated according to this section shall be rebated to the consumer. If the rebate otherwise required is less than one dollar, no rebate need be made.

Upon prepayment in full of a consumer credit transaction, other than one pursuant to a revolving account, a refinancing, or a consolidation, whether or not precomputed, the creditor may collect or retain a minimum charge within the limits stated in this subsection (2) if the finance charge earned at the time of prepayment is less than any minimum charge contracted for. The minimum charge may not exceed the lesser of the amount of finance charge contracted for or twenty-five dollars.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the unearned portion of the finance charge is a fraction of the finance charge of which the numerator is the sum of the periodic balances scheduled to follow the computational period in which prepayment occurs, and the denominator is the sum of all periodic balances under either the consumer credit agreement or, if the balance owing resulted from a refinancing described in section 5-2-205 or a consolidation described in section 5-2-206, under the refinancing agreement or consolidation agreement.

With respect to a precomputed transaction entered into on or after October 28, 1975, and payable according to its original terms in more than sixty-one installments or on any precomputed transaction entered into on or after January 1, 1982, the unearned portion of the finance charge is, at the option of the lender, either:

That portion that is applicable to all fully unexpired computational periods as originally scheduled, or if deferred, as deferred, that follow the date of prepayment. For this purpose, the applicable charge is the total of that which would have been made for each such period, had the consumer credit transaction not been precomputed, by applying to unpaid balances of the amount financed, according to the actuarial method, the annual percentage rate of charge previously stated to the consumer pursuant to the provisions on disclosure contained in section 5-3-101 based upon the assumption that all payments were made as originally scheduled, or if deferred, as deferred. The creditor, at the creditor's option, may round the annual percentage rate to the nearest one-half of one percent so long as such procedure is not consistently used to obtain a greater yield than would otherwise be permitted; or

The total finance charge minus the earned finance charge. The earned finance charge shall be determined by applying the annual percentage rate previously stated to the consumer pursuant to the provisions on disclosure contained in section 5-3-101 according to the actuarial method to the actual unpaid balances for the actual time the balances were unpaid up to the date of prepayment. If a delinquency or deferral charge was collected, it shall be treated as a payment.

In the case of a consumer credit transaction primarily secured by an interest in land, reasonable sums actually paid or payable to persons not related to the creditor for customary closing costs included in the finance charge shall be deducted from the finance charge before the calculation prescribed by this subsection (3) is made.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Computational period" means one month if one-half or more of the intervals between scheduled payments under the agreement is one month or more and otherwise means one week.

The "interval" to the due date of the first scheduled installment or the final scheduled payment date is measured from the date of a consumer credit transaction and includes either the first or last day of the interval. If the interval to the due date of the first scheduled installment does not exceed one month by more than fifteen days when the computational period is one month or eleven days when the computational period is one week, the interval shall be considered as one computational period.

"Periodic balance" means the amount scheduled to be outstanding on the last day of a computational period before deducting the payment, if any, scheduled to be made on that day.

This subsection (5) applies only if the schedule of payments is not regular.

If the computational period is one month and:

If the number of days in the interval to the due date of the first scheduled installment is less than one month by more than five days or more than one month by more than five but not more than fifteen days, the unearned finance charge shall be increased by an adjustment for each day by which the interval is less than one month and, at the option of the creditor, may be reduced by an adjustment for each day by which the interval is more than one month; the adjustment for each day shall be one-thirtieth of that part of the finance charge earned in the computational period prior to the due date of the first scheduled installment assuming that period to be one month; and

If the interval to the final scheduled payment date is a number of computational periods plus an additional number of days less than a full month, the additional number of days shall be considered a computational period only if sixteen days or more. This subparagraph (II) applies whether or not subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) applies.

Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection (5), if the computational period is one month, the number of days in the interval to the due date of the first installment exceeds one month by not more than fifteen days and the schedule of payments is otherwise regular, the creditor at the creditor's option may exclude the extra days and the charge for the extra days in computing the unearned finance charge; but if the creditor does so and a rebate is required before the due date of the first scheduled installment, the creditor shall compute the earned charge for each elapsed day as one-thirtieth of the amount the earned charge would have been if the first interval had been one month.

If the computational period is one week and:

If the number of days in the interval to the due date of the first scheduled installment is less than five days or more than nine days but not more than eleven days, the unearned finance charge shall be increased by an adjustment for each day by which the interval is less than seven days and, at the option of the creditor, may be reduced by an adjustment for each day by which the interval is more than seven days; the adjustment for each day shall be one-seventh of that part of the finance charge earned in the computational period prior to the due date of the first scheduled installment assuming that period to be one week; and

If the interval to the final scheduled payment date is a number of computational periods plus an additional number of days less than a full week, the additional number of days shall be considered a computational period only if four days or more. This subparagraph (II) applies whether or not subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d) applies.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section, if a deferral described in section 5-2-204 has been agreed to, the unearned portion of the finance charge is the portion thereof attributable according to the sum of the balances method to the period from the first day of the computational period following that in which prepayment occurs; except that the numerator of the fraction is the sum of the periodic balances, after rescheduling to give effect to any deferral, scheduled to follow the computational period in which prepayment occurs. A separate rebate of the deferral charge is not required unless the unpaid balance of the transaction is paid in full during the deferral period, in which event the creditor shall also rebate the unearned portion of the deferral charge.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section, this section does not preclude the collection or retention by the creditor of delinquency charges described in section 5-2-203.

If the maturity is accelerated for any reason and judgment is obtained, the consumer is entitled to the same rebate as if payment had been made on the date judgment is entered.

Upon prepayment in full of a consumer credit transaction by the proceeds of consumer credit insurance described in section 5-4-103, the consumer or the consumer's estate is entitled to the same rebate as though the consumer had prepaid the agreement on the date the proceeds of the insurance are paid to the creditor but no later than ten business days after satisfactory proof of loss is furnished to the creditor.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1203, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

IP(3)(b) and (5)(d)(I) amended, p. 28, § 3, effective March 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-210, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-212. Surcharges on credit transactions - enforcement - definitions.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 24-19.5-103 (3) and 29-11.5-103 (3), a seller or lessor in any sales or lease transaction may impose a surcharge on a buyer or lessee who elects to use a credit or charge card in lieu of payment by cash, check, or similar means in accordance with subsection (1)(c) of this section.

A surcharge is any additional amount imposed at the time of the sales or lease transaction by the merchant, seller, or lessor that increases the charge to the buyer or lessee for the privilege of using a credit or charge card.

A seller or lessor may impose a surcharge pursuant to either subsection (1)(c)(I) or (1)(c)(II) of this section as follows:

An amount not to exceed two percent of the total cost to the buyer or lessee for the sales or lease transaction. A seller or lessor that imposes a surcharge on credit or charge cards shall post signage at the seller's or lessor's premises in a manner that is visible to customers or, for a sales or lease transaction made online, display before an online customer's completion of the sales or lease transaction in a manner that is visible to the online customer, the following language:

An amount not to exceed the merchant discount fee that the seller or lessor incurs in processing the sales or lease transaction. The seller or lessor or the seller's or lessor's service provider shall calculate the surcharge at an amount not to exceed the actual amount paid to the processor or service provider to process the transaction.

A seller or lessor shall post signage at the seller's or lessor's premises in a manner that is visible to customers or, for a sales or lease transaction made online, display before an online customer's completion of the sales or lease transaction in a manner that is visible to the online customer, the following language:

The service provider may provide the seller or lessor with the means to make the disclosure required by this subsection (1)(c)(II).

For any goods or services purchased or leased through payment by credit or charge card, the seller, lessor, or service provider shall provide as a separate line item on the customer's receipt the surcharge amount imposed pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this section.

A seller or lessor may impose only a single credit or charge card surcharge per sales or lease transaction pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section.

A seller or lessor shall not impose a surcharge if a customer elects to pay for goods or services by:

Using cash or a check;

Using a debit card, whether or not a personal identification number is used;

Processing a payment as a debit payment; or

Redeeming a gift card.

As used in this subsection (1):

"Charge card" includes those cards pursuant to which unpaid balances are payable on demand.

"Merchant discount fee" means the actual fee, expressed as a percentage or fixed amount of the total transaction amount, that a seller or lessor pays its processor or service provider to process the transaction.

A discount offered by a seller or lessor for the purpose of inducing payment by cash, check, or other means not involving the use of a seller or lender credit card shall not constitute a finance charge if such discount is offered to all prospective buyers and its availability is disclosed to all prospective buyers clearly and conspicuously in accordance with regulations of the administrator.

A seller or lessor who violates this section:

(I) Violates the code; and

(II) Is subject to liability as a creditor under the code.

For purposes of liability for a violation of this section, a buyer or lessee is a consumer.

A seller or lessor may impose a surcharge under this section regardless of any contract or agreement that the seller or lessor enters into on or after July 1, 2022.

To cover the cost of processing a credit or charge card transaction, and pursuant to section 5-2-212, Colorado Revised Statutes, a seller or lessor may impose a processing surcharge in an amount not to exceed 2% of the total payment made for goods or services purchased or leased by use of a credit or charge card. A seller or lessor shall not impose a processing surcharge on payments made by use of cash, a check, or a debit card or redemption of a gift card.

To cover the cost of processing a credit or charge card transaction, and pursuant to section 5-2-212, Colorado Revised Statutes, a seller or lessor may impose a processing surcharge in an amount not to exceed the merchant discount fee that the seller or lessor incurs in processing the sales or lease transaction. A seller or lessor shall not impose a processing surcharge on payments made by use of cash, a check, or a debit card or redemption of a gift card.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1206, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1442, § 3, effective April 29.

L. 2021:

(1) amended and (3) and (4) added, (SB 21-091), ch. 476, p. 3404, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-3-110, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-213. Lender and seller credit cards.

For purposes of this section, "credit card bank or financial institution" means a commercial bank, credit union, thrift, savings and loan association, savings bank, or other state or federally supervised institution in this state that issues credit cards and may export rates and fees pursuant to the "National Bank Act", 12 U.S.C. sec. 85, "Depository Institutions Deregulation and Monetary Control Act of 1980", 12 U.S.C. secs. 1463, 1785, and 1831d, "Federal Credit Union Act", 12 U.S.C. sec. 1757, or "Alternative Mortgage Transaction Parity Act of 1982", 12 U.S.C. secs. 3801 to 3805, and any regulations under those acts.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part 2, with respect to a lender or seller credit card issued by a credit card bank or financial institution:

The finance charge, calculated according to the actuarial method, may not exceed the amounts provided in section 5-2-201; and

Any fees imposed for a minimum finance charge described in section 5-2-201 (3)(b), annual charges described in section 5-2-202 (1)(c), cash advances described in section 5-2-202 (1)(e)(I), return or dishonor of a check described in section 5-2-202 (1)(e)(II), delinquency described in section 5-2-203, or exceeding the credit limit may be in an amount established by written agreement of the parties.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1206, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1468, § 20, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-3-508, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-214. Alternative charges for loans not exceeding one thousand dollars.

For a consumer loan where the amount financed is not more than one thousand dollars, a supervised lender may charge, in lieu of the loan finance charges permitted by section 5-2-201, the following finance charges:

An acquisition charge for making the original loan, not to exceed ten percent of the amount financed;

An acquisition charge for making any refinanced loan, not to exceed seven and one-half percent of the amount financed; and

A monthly installment account handling charge, not to exceed the following amounts:

The minimum term of a loan made pursuant to this section shall be ninety days. The maximum term of a loan made pursuant to this section shall be twelve months. All loans shall be scheduled to be payable in substantially equal installments at equal periodic intervals.

On a loan subject to the alternative charges authorized by this section, no other finance charge or any other charge or fee is permitted except as specifically provided for in this section and except for the delinquency charges provided for in section 5-2-203, reasonable attorney fees provided for in section 5-5-112, and the fee for a dishonored check provided for in section 5-2-202 (1)(e)(II).

The acquisition charge authorized in this section shall be fully earned at the time the loan is made and shall not be subject to refund; except that, if the loan is prepaid in full, refinanced, or consolidated within the first sixty days, the first ten dollars of the acquisition charge shall be retained by the lender and the remainder of the acquisition charge shall be refunded at a rate of one-sixtieth of the remainder of the acquisition charge per day, beginning on the day after the date of the prepayment, refinancing, or consolidation and ending on the sixtieth day after the loan was made.

Upon the prepayment of a loan made pursuant to this section, the unearned portion of the installment account handling charge shall be refunded to the consumer. The unearned portion of the installment account handling charge that is refunded shall be calculated pursuant to the provisions on rebate upon prepayment contained in section 5-2-211 on the date of refinancing; except that, for the purpose of computing this amount, no minimum charge described in section 5-2-201 shall be allowed.

The rates and charges permitted by this section shall not apply to deferred deposit loans subject to article 3.1 of this title.

A lender shall not take collateral from a consumer as security for payment for any loan made pursuant to this section.

A lender may not refinance a loan made pursuant to this section more than three times in one year.

Amount financed
Per month charge
$100.00 - $ 300
$12.50
$300.01 - $ 500
$15.00
$500.01 - $ 750
$17.50
$750.01 - $ 1,000
$20.00

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 589, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2007:

(1)(a) and (5) amended and (1)(a.5), (7), and (8) added, p. 711, §§ 1, 2, effective August 3.